Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Definitions

257.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Abandon” means to forsake entirely, or to neglect or refuse to provide or perform the legal obligations for care and support of an animal by its owner or his agent;

“Board” means the Board of Agriculture;

“Commission” means the Kentucky Livestock Care Standards Commission;

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Communicable disease” means a disease that can be directly or indirectly transmitted from one (1) animal to another;

“Compost” means the humus-like product of the process of composting domestic livestock, poultry, or fish, which may be used as a soil conditioner or enhancer;

“Composting” means the biological decomposition of organic matter;

“Council” means the Kentucky Equine Health and Welfare Council;

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture;

“Fish” means the bodies and parts of bodies of all animal aquatic life being raised, or kept for sale to a wholesaler or retailer, or for direct sale to the public;

“Livestock” means:

Cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, llamas, buffaloes, or any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species; and

Deer, elk, and any other animal of the cervid species whose regulatory requirements are under KRS Chapters 150 and 246, and are privately owned and raised in a confined area for breeding stock, food, fiber, and other products;

“National animal identification system” means a national program intended to identify animals and track them as they come into contact with or commingle with animals other than herdmates from their premises of origin;

“National Poultry Improvement Plan” shall have the same meaning as set out in the United States Code of Federal Regulations, 9 C.F.R. Part 145, and the auxiliary provisions in 9 C.F.R. Part 147;

“Owner” means any person owning or leasing from another, or having in charge any domestic animal;

“Poultry” means chickens, ducks, turkeys, or other domestic fowl being raised or kept on any premises in the Commonwealth;

“Premises” means any portion of land, or any structure erected on land; and

“Reportable disease” means an animal disease that shall be reported to state or federal animal health officials when suspected or diagnosed.

History.

63c-1, 4618-78: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 248, § 1; 1986, ch. 6, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 58, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 88, § 12, effective March 28, 2002; 2005, ch. 115, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 27, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 22, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 106, § 4, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Apiaries, KRS ch. 252.

“Cattle” defined, KRS

446.010

.

Dogs, KRS ch. 258.

Strays and animals running at large, KRS ch. 259.

Treatises

Kentucky Instructions To Juries (Civil), 5th Ed., Animals, §§
15.04, 15.05.

ALR

Communicable disease, extent of liability of seller of livestock infected with. 14 A.L.R.4th 1096.